test/src/morphology/N-maks_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - maks: # Noun 80 'eng /est maks ­u/fin' - full paradigm
     maks+N+Sg+Nom: maks
     maks+N+Sg+Gen: maks
     maks+N+Sg+Par: maksõ
     maks+N+Sg+Dat: maksõn
     maks+N+Sg+Ins: maksõks
     maks+N+Sg+Ill: maksõ
     maks+N+Sg+Ela: maksõst
     maks+N+Pl+Nom: maksūd
     maks+N+Pl+Gen: maksūd
     maks+N+Pl+Par: maksīdi
     maks+N+Pl+Dat: maksūdõn
     maks+N+Pl+Ins: maksūdõks
     maks+N+Pl+Ill: maksīž
     maks+N+Pl+Ela: maksīst
